Missouri, session 2026, HB3267.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 643, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 643.680, to read as follows:
643.680. 1. The intentional injection, release, or dispersion, by any means, of
chemicals, chemical compounds, substances, or apparatus within the borders of this
state into the atmosphere with the express purpose of affecting temperature, weather, or
the intensity of the sunlight is prohibited.
2. The air conservation commission of the state of Missouri established under
section 643.040 shall establish standards and guidelines for the enforcement of this
section.
3. The department of natural resources may promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.